Nevada, session 83, AB113.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Workforce Innovations for a New Nevada
Account created by NRS 231.151 to carry out the provisions of NRS
231.141 to 231.152, inclusive, the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $5,000,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $5,000,000
2. The sums appropriated by subsection 1 are available for
either fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to
which the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from
the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner,
and any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity
to which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the
money was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be
reverted to the State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
-
*AB113*

– 2 –
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB113*